California statutes. Water Code
If a protest against the inclusion of lands, signed by not less than 3 percent of the holders of title or evidence of title to lands within the district who hold the title or evidence of title to not less than 3 percent in value of the lands within the district according to the last equalized assessment roll of the county within which such lands are situated, is presented to the board and upon the hearing of the matter such protest is not withdrawn, or after the withdrawal therefrom of any signatures it is still signed by not less than 3 percent of the holders of title or evidence of title to lands within the district who hold the title or evidence of title to not less than 3 percent in value of the lands within the district according to the last equalized assessment roll of the county within which such lands are situated, or if the board deems it not for the best interests of the district to include therein the lands described in the petition for inclusion, or any of them, the board shall adopt a resolution stating the facts and describing the boundaries of the tract of land proposed to be included in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75901.

Upon the adoption of the resolution pursuant to Section 75900, the board shall order that an election be held within the district to determine whether the boundaries shall be changed as mentioned in such resolution; and shall fix the time at which such election shall be held, and cause notice thereof to be given and published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75902.

Before calling the election, the board may require an undertaking from the petitioners for the inclusion of the land, conditioned that the petitioners or the sureties will pay all the costs of holding the election in case the inclusion is denied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 413.)
-------------------------------------------

75903.

Notice of the election shall be given and published, the election shall be held and conducted, the returns thereof shall be made and canvassed, and the result of the election ascertained and declared, and all things pertaining thereto conducted, in the manner prescribed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 74790) of Part 6 of this division.

(History: Added by stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75904.

The notice of election shall describe the proposed change of the boundaries in such manner and terms that it can readily be traced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75905.

The ballots cast at the election shall contain the words “For change of boundaries,” or “Against change of boundaries,” or words equivalent thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75906.

If a majority of all the votes cast at the election are against change of the boundaries of the district, the board shall order that the petition for inclusion of lands be denied and shall proceed no further in the matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75907.

If a majority of the votes cast at the election are in favor of the change of the boundaries of the district, the board shall order that the boundaries be changed in accordance with the resolution adopted by the board pursuant to Section 75900. The order shall describe the entire boundaries of the district, and for that purpose the board shall cause a survey of such portions thereof to be made as it deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Recordation of Order and Petition and Filing of Certificate [75920. - 75922.]

75920.

A copy of the order of the board ordering the change of the boundaries of the district, certified by the president and secretary, shall be filed for record in the recorder’s office of each affected county. The district shall be and remain a district as fully and to every intent and purpose as if the lands which are included in the district by the change of the boundaries had been included therein at the formation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75921.

Upon the filing of the copies of the order pursuant to Section 75920, the secretary shall record the petition for inclusion of lands in the minutes of the board; and such minutes, or a certified copy thereof, shall be admissible in evidence with the same effect as the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75922.

Upon a change of the boundaries of a district being made pursuant to this chapter, the board shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The effective date of the change of the boundaries.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the included land, or reference to a map showing the boundaries of such included land, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order changing the boundaries contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Alternate Procedure [75925. - 75939.]

75925.

The following annexation procedures may be used for annexation of land to any water conservation district as an alternative to the procedures set forth in Articles 2 (commencing with Section 75860) to 5 (commencing with Section 75920), inclusive, of Chapter 2 of Part 10 of Division 21.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75926.

A petition which may consist of any number of separate instruments, shall be filed with the secretary of the district, signed by 20 percent or 500 electors residing within the area so proposed to be annexed.

Such petition shall set forth and describe the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed and shall contain a prayer that such area be annexed to such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75927.

The text of such petition and a notice stating the time of the meeting at which the same will be presented shall be published in the affected county pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. When contained upon one or more instruments, one copy only of such petition need be published. No more than five of the names attached to the petition need appear in the publication of the petition and notice, but the number of signers shall be stated. Publication shall be complete at least 7, but not more than 28, days before the time at which the petition is to be presented to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75928.

Within 10 days of the date of filing of such petition the secretary of the district shall examine the same and ascertain whether or not such petition is signed by the requisite number of voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75929.

When the secretary of the district has completed his examination of the petition, he shall attach to the same his certificate, properly dated, showing the result of such examination, and if from such examination he shall find that said petition is signed by the requisite number of voters or is not so signed, he shall certify that the same is sufficient or insufficient, as the case may be.

If, by the certificate of the secretary of the district, the petition is found to be insufficient, he shall also certify to the number of voters required to make such petition sufficient, and it may be amended by filing a supplemental petition or petitions within 10 days of the date of such certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75930.

The secretary of the district shall, within 10 days after the filing of such supplemental petition or petitions, make like examination of the same and certify to the result of such examination as herein before provided.

If his certificate shall show any such petition, or such petition as amended, to be insufficient, it shall be filed by him with the board of the district and kept as a public record, without prejudice, however, to the filing of a new petition to the same effect, but if, by the certificate of the secretary, such petition, or petition as amended, is shown to be sufficient, the secretary shall present the same to the board without delay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75931.

If any supplemental petition be filed, all the signatures appended to the petition or to the supplemental petition or petitions shall be considered in determining the number of voters signing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75932.

After an election for the annexation of such area to the district the sufficiency of such petition in any respect shall not be subject to judicial review or be otherwise questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75933.

Such petition may be granted by ordinance of the board of such district after hearing thereon held at the time the petition is presented to the board as provided in Section 75927. No petition for inclusion may be granted unless and until the board finds that the inclusion in the district of the lands described in said petition, or of some portion or portions thereof, will be for the best interests of the district and that the lands proposed to be included shall be benefited by such inclusion. The petition may be granted in its entirety or only as to the part of the territory proposed to be included for which such a finding of benefit is made. If the petition be denied either as to the whole or part of the territory to be included, no new petition for the inclusion of such territory shall be filed within six months after such denial. In granting such petition, such board of directors may fix in said ordinance the terms and conditions upon which such annexation may occur, and such terms and conditions may provide, among other things, for the levy by such district of special taxes upon the real property and improvements thereon, but not on personal property within such annexed area or areas in addition to the taxes elsewhere in this act authorized to be levied by such district, and in case such terms and conditions shall provide for the levy of such special taxes, the board, in fixing such terms and conditions, shall specify the aggregate amount to be so raised and the number of years prescribed for raising such aggregate sum and that substantially equal annual levies will be made for the purpose of raising such sum over the period so prescribed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75934.

If such petition is granted, the proposition of such annexation subject to the terms and conditions so fixed, shall be submitted to the vote of the voters in the proposed addition, at an election called by the board and held, as herein provided, within 70 days after the effective date of such ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75935.

Notice of such election shall be published in the affected county pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code. Publication shall be complete at least 7, but not more than 28, days prior to the date fixed for such election. Such notice shall describe the boundaries of the area or areas so proposed to be annexed and shall designate such territory by some appropriate name, or other words of identification, by which such territory may be referred to and indicated upon the ballot to be used at any election at which the question of such annexation is submitted, as in this act provided. Such notice also shall contain the substance of the terms and conditions fixed by the board of directors, as herein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75936.

The measure so submitted at such election shall be stated on the ballot substantially as follows: “Shall ____ (giving the name or other designation of the territory proposed to be annexed, as stated in the notice of election) be annexed to ____ (name of water conservation district) subject to the terms and conditions fixed by the board of directors of said district?” To the right of or below the proposition, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 76.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75937.

The board shall canvass the votes cast at such election and, if such proposition is approved by a majority of the voters voting thereon at such election, the president and secretary of the board of directors shall certify that fact to the Secretary of State and shall record a certificate stating that such proposition was adopted with the county recorder of each affected county in which such district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75938.

Upon receipt of such certificate, the Secretary of State shall, within 10 days, issue his certificate reciting the passage of said ordinance and the addition of said area or areas to said district. A copy of said certificate shall be transmitted to, and filed with, the county clerk of each affected county in which such district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

75939.

From and after the date of such certificate, the area or areas named therein shall be deemed added to, and shall form a part of, said district, and the taxable property therein shall be subject to taxation thereafter for the purposes of said district, including the payment of bonds and other obligations of such district at the time authorized or outstanding, and the board of the district shall be empowered to do all things necessary to enforce and make effective the terms and conditions of annexation fixed as hereinabove authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Annexation of Districts [75940. - 76010.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [75940. - 75940.]

75940.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Petitioning district” means a water conservation district which proposes to petition or which has petitioned another water conservation district to annex its territory to that other water conservation district.

(b) “Annexing district” means a water conservation district which has been petitioned by a petitioning district to be annexed thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure in Petitioning District [75950. - 75954.]

75950.

Proceedings by the petitioning district are initiated:

(a) When the board of the district determines that it would be for the best interests of the district to be annexed to another water conservation district and adopts, by resolution, a proposed annexation petition; or

(b) When 500, or 5 percent, or more, of the qualified voters of the district sign a proposed annexation petition and submit it to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75951.

A proposed annexation petition shall contain:

(a) A request addressed to the annexing district, petitioning the annexing district to annex the petitioning district.

(b) A statement setting forth the desirability or necessity of the annexation. 

(c) Any terms subject to which the annexation shall be conditioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75952.

Within 30 days after annexation proceedings have been initiated, the board of the petitioning district shall call and provide for the holding of a special election, at which election the proposition of adopting the proposed annexation petition shall be submitted to the electors of the petitioning district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75953.

The manner of holding and conducting the election, the selection of officers to conduct it, the designation of precincts and polling places, the preparation, receipt, counting, and returning of ballots, and the canvassing and determining results of the election shall be as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 74790) of Part 6 of this division, and, in particulars not so provided, shall be in accordance with the general laws of the state relative to elections at which propositions are submitted and voted upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75954.

Upon the canvassing of the votes cast in the election, if it appears that a majority of all votes cast are in favor of the annexation petition, the board of the petitioning district shall, within 10 days after the canvass of the vote, forward to the board of the annexing district a certified copy of the annexation petition, together with a certificate that the petition has been submitted to the electors of the petitioning district and adopted by a majority of those voting at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procedure in Annexing District [75970. - 75975.]

75970.

Within 30 days after the receipt of an annexation petition from a petitioning district, the board of the annexing district shall, if it favors the annexation, adopt a resolution setting forth its intention to annex the petitioning district, and shall cause the resolution of intention to annex to be published once a week for at least three weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the office of the annexing district is situated. The board shall state in such publication the date when the board proposes to finally act upon the petition for annexation, which date shall be at least 40 days after the first publication of the resolution of intention to annex.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75971.

If, on the date set by the board for the final action on the annexation petition, there is presented to the board of the annexing district written protests signed by 3 percent, or 1,000, or more, of the electors of the annexing district, the board shall call and provide for an election at which there shall be submitted to the electors of the annexing district the question as to whether or not the petitioning district shall be annexed upon the terms set forth in the annexation petition.

If sufficient protests are not presented the board may adopt an order annexing the petitioning district, or may, in its discretion, submit the question to the electors of the district as though sufficient protests had been presented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75972.

If the question of annexation is submitted to the electors of the annexing district, the election shall be held in the same manner as provided in this chapter for the election in the petitioning district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75973.

If a majority of all votes cast at the election are against the proposed annexation, the annexation petition shall be denied. If a majority of all votes cast are in favor of the proposed annexation, the board of the annexing district shall thereupon adopt an order annexing the petitioning district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75974.

The order annexing the petitioning district shall describe the boundaries of the land to be annexed to the annexing district, and if such land adjoins any portion of the annexing district, the order shall also describe that portion of the boundary of the annexing district which coincides with the boundaries of the land annexed. For the purposes of the order the board may cause a survey to be made of such portions of the boundaries as it deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75975.

Upon the annexation of a district as provided in this chapter, the annexation order and the annexation petition shall be recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Conditions to Annexation [75990. - 75991.]

75990.

As a condition to annexation, the petitioning district and the annexing district may agree to any financial adjustments and may provide for the payment by the petitioning district of such sums as may be mutually determined to be just and equitable as compensation for any benefits that it may receive by virtue of the annexation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75991.

Bonds of the petitioning district may be voted upon and issued in the manner provided for the incurring of bonded indebtedness of the district and may thereafter be delivered at not less than par value to constitute payment under Section 75990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Effect of Annexation Upon Petitioning District [76000. - 76001.]

76000.

Upon the adoption of an order of annexation, the petitioning district shall be deemed dissolved, except that if there is any outstanding indebtedness of the petitioning district at the time of the dissolution thereof, the board of the annexing district shall furnish annually to the board of supervisors of the county in which the petitioning district is situated, or, if such district is situated in more than one county, then to the board of supervisors of each county in which any portion of the district is situated, an estimate in writing of the amount needed (computed as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 75350) of Part 8 of this division) for the payment of such outstanding indebtedness of the petitioning district in like manner as though the district had not been dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

76001.

Upon receipt of the estimates furnished pursuant to Section 76000, the board or boards of supervisors shall levy an assessment on the lands comprising the petitioning district, in the manner provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 75370) of Part 8 of this division, and the board of the annexing district shall cause the obligations evidencing such indebtedness to be paid according to their tenor out of the money raised from such assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Filing of Certificate [76010. - 76010.]

76010.

Upon the annexation of the petitioning district to the annexing district, the board of the annexing district shall file with the Secretary of State a certificate listing:

(a) The names of the annexing district and the petitioning district.

(b) The effective date of the annexation and of the dissolution of the petitioning district.

(c) The county or counties in which the two districts are located, and a description of the annexed land, or reference to a map showing the boundaries of such annexed land, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order annexing the petitioning district contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Consolidation [76020. - 76020.]

76020.

A district may be consolidated in the same manner as is provided for the consolidation of county water districts in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Part 8 of Division 12 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Dissolution [76030. - 76061.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition and Hearing [76030. - 76032.]

76030.

A district may be dissolved by the board of supervisors of the principal county in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

76031.

Upon receiving a petition signed by 10 percent of the electors of the district, or by the owners of one-half of the lands comprising the district, requesting the dissolution of the district, the board of supervisors shall publish a notice once a week for two weeks in some newspaper in the principal county, and also in each affected county, giving notice that such petition has been filed with the board of supervisors, and that the board will hear such petition, and all objections thereto, at the next regular meeting of said board after the expiration of the time of publishing the notice (specifying the date), and directing all persons interested therein to show cause at such time, if any they have, why the district should not be dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

76032.

At the time appointed for the hearing, or at any time to which the hearing may be adjourned, the board of supervisors shall hear and pass upon the petition, and may grant or deny the same. If its decision is against the dissolution of the district, such decision shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election [76040. - 76042.]

76040.

If the petition for dissolution is granted, the board of supervisors shall, by resolution, provide for and order the holding of a special election in the district, and shall submit to the qualified electors of the district the proposition of whether or not the district shall be dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

76041.

The resolution calling the election shall recite the filing of the petition for dissolution and the approval thereof by the board of supervisors, and shall fix a time for the holding of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

76042.

The election shall be noticed and conducted, and the returns of the election made and canvassed, in the same manner as is provided for the formation
 election. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 77.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Order of Dissolution and Filing of Certificate [76050. - 76052.]

76050.

If votes representing 60 percent of the total number of votes cast are cast in favor of the dissolution of the district, the board of supervisors shall enter an order to that effect upon its minutes, declaring the district dissolved, and upon the entry of such order the district shall be dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

76051.

If there is any outstanding indebtedness of the district, at the time of the dissolution thereof, the board of supervisors shall levy assessments for the payment of such indebtedness in like manner as though such district had not been dissolved, until all such indebtedness is fully paid, and shall cause such obligations to be paid according to their tenor out of the moneys raised from such assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

76052.

Upon dissolution of a district, the clerk of the board of supervisors shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The effective date of dissolution.

(c) The county or counties in which the district was located.

If the order declaring the district dissolved contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the clerk of the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Vesting of Property Upon Dissolution [76060. - 76061.]

76060.

Upon the dissolution of a district, any and all real property belonging to the district shall become and be the property of the county in which the real property is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

76061.

The personal property belonging to a district upon its dissolution shall be sold by the board of supervisors of the principal county, and the proceeds from such sale, together with all moneys of the district, remaining after the payment of all of the obligations of the district, shall be paid into the general funds of the affected counties in the same proportions that the assessed values of the lands (according to the last assessment rolls) within the district in each of such counties bear one to the other.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. REPEALS [76500. - 76501.]

76500.

Chapter 166 of the Statutes of 1929 and Chapter 1020 of the Statutes of 1931 are repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

76501.

The repeals effected by this part shall not be construed to deprive any person or entity of any substantial right which would have existed or hereafter exist had such repeal not been effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 24. SAFE, CLEAN, RELIABLE WATER SUPPLY ACT [78500. - 78702.]



CHAPTER 1. Short Title and Findings and Declarations [78500. - 78500.4.]

78500.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78500.2.

In placing this measure before the voters, the Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The state faces a water crisis that threatens our economy and environment.

(b) The state’s growing population has increasing needs for safe water supplies which are essential to the public health, safety, and welfare.

(c) It is of paramount importance that the limited water resources of the state be protected from pollution, and conserved and recycled whenever economically, environmentally, and technically feasible.

(d) The state should plan to meet the water supply needs of all beneficial uses of water, including urban, agricultural, and environmental, utilizing a wide range of strategies including water conservation and recycling, conjunctive use of surface and groundwater supplies, water transfers, and improvements in the state’s water storage and delivery systems to meet the growing water needs of the state.

(e) This measure is a necessary first step toward providing for the state’s long-term water supply requirements through a number of water management strategies.

(f) The San Francisco Bay/Sacramento San Joaquin Delta Estuary (the Bay-Delta) is of statewide and national importance. The Bay-Delta provides habitat for more than 120 species of fish and wildlife and serves as a major link in our water delivery system for businesses and farms statewide and more than 22 million residents.

(g) The state has signed an historic accord with federal officials and statewide water interests that calls for the development of a comprehensive and long-term solution for the water supply reliability, water quality, and environmental problems of the Bay-Delta.

(h) Federal and state representatives have initiated a program known as CALFED, to develop a comprehensive and long-term solution to the problems associated with the Bay-Delta, including an equitable allocation of program costs among beneficiary groups. The success of the CALFED program is vital to the environmental and economic well-being of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78500.4.

In enacting this measure, the people of California declare all of the following to be the objectives of this act:

(a) To provide a safe, clean, affordable, and sufficient water supply to meet the needs of California residents, farms, and businesses.

(b) To develop lasting water solutions that balance the needs of the state’s economy and its environment.

(c) To restore ecological health for native fish and wildlife, and their natural habitats, including wetlands.

(d) To protect the integrity of the state’s water supply system from catastrophic failure due to earthquakes and flooding.

(e) To protect drinking water quality.

(f) To protect the quality of life in our communities by ensuring recreational opportunities and maintaining parks, trees, and plants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [78501. - 78501.]

78501.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this division:

(a) “Bay-delta” means the San Francisco Bay/Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Estuary.

(b) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(c) “CALFED” refers to a consortium of five state agencies, including the Resources Agency, the department, the Department of Fish and Game, the California Environmental Protection Agency, and the board, and five federal agencies, including the United States Department of Interior, the United States Bureau of Reclamation, the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, the Environmental Protection Agency, and the National Marine Fisheries Service, with management and regulatory responsibilities in the bay-delta.

(d) “Clean Water Act” means the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C.A. Sec. 1251 et seq.) and includes any amendments thereto.

(e) “Committee” means the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 78693.

(f) “Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(g) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(h) “Fund” means the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Fund created pursuant to Section 78505.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Fund [78505. - 78505.]

78505.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Delta Improvement Program [78525. - 78572.]



  ARTICLE 1. The Delta Improvement Account [78525. - 78526.]

78525.

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this chapter, “account” means the Delta Improvement Account created by Section 78526.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78526.

The Delta Improvement Account is hereby created in the fund. The sum of one hundred ninety-three million dollars ($193,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Central Valley Project Improvement Program [78530. - 78531.]

78530.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Central Valley Project Improvement Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Central Valley Project Improvement Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78530.5.

The sum of ninety-three million dollars ($93,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78531.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Controller, to be allocated to pay the state’s share of the costs for fish and wildlife restoration measures required by Section 3406 of the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (P.L. 102-575), in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) Funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be allocated to the Department of Fish and Game or the department for expenditure pursuant to the terms of the cost-sharing agreement between the United States and the State of California as required by subsection (h) of Section 3406 of the Central Valley Project Improvement Act, or any agreements supplemental thereto, for the payment of costs allocated to the state for the protection and restoration of fish and wildlife resources and habitat pursuant to Section 3406 of that federal act.

(c) The money in the subaccount may be used for both of the following purposes:

(1) To pay for the state’s cost-sharing allocations or for actions directly undertaken by the department or the Department of Fish and Game relating to fish and wildlife restoration actions required by Section 3406 of the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (P.L. 102-575). For purposes of this paragraph, and consistent with Attachment C of the “Principles for Agreement on Bay-Delta standards between the State of California and the Federal Government,” dated December 15, 1994, preference for the screening of diversions shall be given to projects, and projects within programs, identified in the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (P.L. 102-575) for which deadlines have been established by state or federal agencies, or by a state or federal court. Any preference established under this paragraph shall be revised if the deadlines are extended or eliminated.

(2) To pay for administrative costs incurred in connection with the implementation of this section by the department and the Department of Fish and Game related to fish and wildlife restoration measures undertaken pursuant to Section 3406 of the Central Valley Project Improvement Act (P.L. 102-575), as follows:

(A) Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount for the use of the department may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article by the department.
